algorithms/indonesian/stem_ISO_8859_1.sbl
// based on:
// A Study of Stemming Effects on Information Retrieval in Bahasa Indonesia,
// Fadillah Z Tala.
// http://www.illc.uva.nl/Publications/ResearchReports/MoL-2003-02.text.pdf

integers ( n_syllables )
booleans (
    prefix_meng
    prefix_peng
    prefix_di
    prefix_ter
    prefix_ke
    prefix_ber
    prefix_per
)

routines (
    count_syllables
    init_prefixes
    strip_particle
    strip_possessive
    strip_first_order_prefix
    strip_second_order_prefix
    strip_suffix
    stop_if_short
)

externals ( stem )

groupings ( v )

stringescapes {}

define v        'aeiou'

define count_syllables as (
    do (
        $n_syllables = 0
        repeat (
            (v $n_syllables += 1) or (hop 1)
        )
    )
)

backwardmode (
    define strip_particle as (
        [substring] among (
            'kah' (delete $n_syllables -= 1)
            'lah' (delete $n_syllables -= 1)
            'pun' (delete $n_syllables -= 1)
        )
    )

    define strip_possessive as (
        [substring] among (
            'ku'  (delete $n_syllables -= 1)
            'mu'  (delete $n_syllables -= 1)
            'nya' (delete $n_syllables -= 1)
        )
    )

    define strip_suffix as (
        (['kan'] (not (prefix_ke or prefix_peng or prefix_per))
            delete $n_syllables -= 1) or
        ([ 'an'] (not (prefix_di or prefix_meng or prefix_ter))
            delete $n_syllables -= 1) or
        (  'si') /* keep this */ or
        ([  'i'] (not (prefix_ber or prefix_ke or prefix_peng))
            delete $n_syllables -= 1)
    )
)

define strip_first_order_prefix as (
    (['me'
        (
            ('ng']   delete) or
            ('ny'] v <- 's') or
            ('n']    delete) or
            ('m']  v <- 'p') or
            ('m']    delete) or
            (]       delete)
            )
            $n_syllables -= 1
            set prefix_meng
    ) or
    (['pe'
        (
            ('ng']   delete) or
            ('ny'] v <- 's') or
            ('n']    delete) or
            ('m']  v <- 'p') or
            ('m']    delete)
        )
        $n_syllables -= 1
        set prefix_peng
    ) or
    (
        (
            (['di']  delete set prefix_di) or
            (['ter'] delete set prefix_ter) or
            (['ke']  delete set prefix_ke)
        )
        $n_syllables -= 1
    )
)

define strip_second_order_prefix as (
    (['be'
        (
            ('lajar'] <- 'ajar') or
            (    'r'] delete) or
            (       ] non-v 'er' delete)
        )
        set prefix_ber
        $n_syllables -= 1
    ) or
    (['pe'
        (
            ('lajar'] <- 'ajar') or
            (    'r'] delete) or
            (       ] delete)
        )
        set prefix_per
        $n_syllables -= 1
    )
)

define stop_if_short as (
    $n_syllables > 2
)

define init_prefixes as (
    unset prefix_meng
    unset prefix_peng
    unset prefix_di
    unset prefix_ter
    unset prefix_ke
    unset prefix_ber
    unset prefix_per
)

define stem as (
    count_syllables
    stop_if_short
    backwards ( try strip_particle )
    stop_if_short
    backwards ( try strip_possessive )
    init_prefixes
    (
        stop_if_short
        (
            strip_first_order_prefix  // or fail and try strip second_order
            do ( // must not fail or second branch will be tried
                stop_if_short
                backwards ( strip_suffix ) // stop here if fails
                stop_if_short
                strip_second_order_prefix
            )
        )
        or
        (
            try strip_second_order_prefix
            stop_if_short
            backwards ( strip_suffix )
        )
    )
)
